Wisconsin, session 2025, SB83.
do enact as follows:SB83,11Section 1. 49.45 (9o) of the statutes is created to read:SB83,2,3249.45 (9o) Utilization management controls for antipsychotic 3prescription drugs. (a) In this subsection:SB83,2,441. “Prescription drug” has the meaning given in s. 450.01 (20).SB83,2,852. “Utilization management controls” means a set of formal techniques used 6by a health carrier or prescription drug utilization management entity that are 7designed to evaluate prescription drug medical necessity, appropriateness, efficacy, 8or efficiency, including prior authorization and step therapy protocols.SB83,2,119(b) The department may not impose utilization management controls for any 10prescription drug that is approved by the federal food and drug administration and 11is classified as an antipsychotic.SB83,2,1212